lt-LT: Ukulelės korpuso išpjova: Dviguba išpjova; Be išpjovos; Viena išpjova; Kita
pt-BR: Ukulele corpo cutaway: Cutaway duplo; Sem cutaway; Cutaway simples; Outro
de: Cutaway des Ukulelenkorpus: Double-Cutaway; Kein Cutaway; Single-Cutaway; Andere
hu: Ukulele testének kivágása: Dupla kivágás; Nincs kivágás; Szimpla kivágás; Egyéb
th: ภาพตัดขวางตัวเครื่องอูคูเลเล: เว้าคู่; ไม่เว้า; เว้าเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
ko: 우쿨렐레 바디 컷어웨이: 더블 컷어웨이; 컷어웨이 없음; 싱글 컷어웨이; 기타
sk-SK: Výrez pre telo ukulele: Dvojitý výrez; Bez výrezu; Jeden výrez; Iné
cs: Výřez v tělu ukulele: Dvojitý výřez; Bez výřezu; Jednoduchý výřez; Ostatní
ru: Вырез корпуса укулеле: Двойной вырез; Без выреза; Одинарный вырез; Другое
nb: Utskjæring i ukulelekropp: Dobbel cutaway; Ingen cutaway; Enkel cutaway; Annet
zh-CN: 尤克里里琴身剖面图: 双缺角; 无缺角; 单缺角; 其他
it: Scasso sul corpo dell'ukulele: Doppia spalla mancante; Senza spalla mancante; Spalla mancante singola; Altro
sv: Ukulele-cutaway: Dubbel cutaway; Ingen cutaway; Enkel cutaway; Övrigt
da: Cutaway på ukulelekrop: Dobbelt cutaway; Uden cutaway; Enkelt cutaway; Andet
ja: ウクレレボディカッタウェイ: ダブルカッタウェイ; カッタウェイなし; シングルカッタウェイ; その他
es: Corte transversal del cuerpo del ukelele: Doble cutaway; Sin cutaway; Cutaway simple; Otro
el: Κόψιμο στο σώμα του ουκουλέλε: Διπλό cutaway; Χωρίς cutaway; Μονό cutaway; Άλλο
fr: Pan coupé du corps de l’ukulélé: Double pan coupé; Sans pan coupé; Pan coupé simple; Autre
nl: Ukulele body cutaway: Dubbele cutaway; Geen cutaway; Enkele cutaway; Anders
vi: Phần khoét trên thân đàn ukulele: Cắt khuyết đôi; Không cắt khuyết; Cắt khuyết đơn; Khác
hr-HR: Izrez za tijelo ukulele: Dvostruki izrez; Bez izreza; Jednostruki izrez; Ostalo
fi: Ukulelen rungon soololovi: Kaksinkertainen soololovi; Ei soololovea; Yksinkertainen soololovi; Muu
ro-RO: Decupajul corpului ukulelei: Cutaway dublu; Fără cutaway; Cutaway simplu; Altele
sl-SI: Izrez trupa ukuleleja: Dvojni izrez; Brez izreza; Enojni izrez; Drugo
bg-BG: Изрез на тялото на укулелето: Двойно изрязано тяло; Без изрязване; Единично изрязване; Друго
en: Ukulele body cutaway: Double cutaway; No cutaway; Single cutaway; Other
tr: Ukulele gövdesi kesiti: Çift kesim; Kesim yok; Tek kesim; Diğer
zh-TW: 烏克麗麗琴身缺角: 雙缺角; 無缺角; 單缺角; 其他
pl: Wycięcie korpusu ukulele: Podwójne wycięcie; Brak wycięcia; Pojedyncze wycięcie; Inne
pt-PT: Cutaway do corpo do ukulele: Cutaway duplo; Sem cutaway; Cutaway simples; Outro